Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Note

Sections 104-1 to 104-4 designated as Part I by L 1995, c
181, §1.

§104-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings:

"Basic hourly rate" means the hourly
wage paid to a laborer or mechanic for work performed during nonovertime hours,
but shall not include the cost to an employer of furnishing fringe benefits,
whether paid directly or indirectly to the laborer or mechanic as provided in
the definition of "wages".

"Construction" includes alteration,
repair, painting, and decorating.

"Contractor" means any person
furnishing construction for a public work under a contract with a governmental
contracting agency, subcontractor, or any other person under a subcontract
arrangement with any person who has a construction contract subject to this
chapter.

"Department" means the department of
labor and industrial relations.

"Director" means the director of
labor and industrial relations of the State.

"Governmental contracting agency"
means the State, any county and any officer, bureau, board, commission, or
other agency or instrumentality thereof.

"Overtime compensation" means
compensation based on not less than one and one-half times the laborers or
mechanics basic hourly rate of pay plus the cost to an employer of furnishing a
laborer or mechanic with fringe benefits as described in the definition of
"wages"; provided that if the department determines that a prevailing
wage is defined by a collective bargaining agreement, the overtime compensation
shall be at the rates set by the applicable collective bargaining agreement.

"Public work" means any project,
including development of any housing pursuant to section 46-15 or chapter 201H
and development, construction, renovation, and maintenance related to
refurbishment of any real or personal property, where the funds or resources
required to undertake the project are to any extent derived, either directly or
indirectly, from public revenues of the State or any county, or from the sale
of securities or bonds whose interest or dividends are exempt from state or
federal taxes.

"Wages", "rate of wages",
"wage rates", "minimum wages" and "prevailing
wages" mean the basic hourly rate and the cost to an employer of furnishing
a laborer or mechanic with fringe benefits, including but not limited to health
and welfare benefits, vacation benefits, and pension benefits, whether paid
directly or indirectly to the laborer or mechanic. [L 1955, c 133, pt of §2; RL
1955, §9A-1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §38; am L 1963, c 44, §1; HRS §104-1; am L
1987, c 288, §2; am L 1988, c 141, §11; am L 1995, c 181, §3; am L 2014, c 130,
§2; am L 2015, c 165, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next